it: Gemelli
xx: Gemelli

en: Schupfnudeln
xx: Schupfnudeln
de: Schupfnudeln

en: Gnocchi
xx: Gnocchi
bg: Ньоки
es: Ñoquis
fr: Gnocchi, gnocchis
hr: njoki
ja: ニョッキ

en: Cooked gnocchis
fr: Gnocchis cuits
hr: Kuhani njoki
it: Gnocchis cotti
nl: Gekookte Gnocchis
sv: Kokta gnocchi

en: Filled gnocchi
de: Gefüllte Gnocchi
fr: Gnocchis fourrés
hr: Punjene njoke

en: Gnocchi of durum wheat semolina, gnocchis from semolina, gnocchi from semolina
de: Grießgnocchi, Gnocchi aus Hartweizengrieß
fr: Gnocchi de semoule de blé dur, Gnocchi à la semoule
hr: Njoke od durum pšenice krupice
nl: Gnocchi van durum tarwe

en: Cooked gnocchis from semolina
fr: Gnocchis à la semoule cuits

it: Lanterne
xx: Lanterne

it: Linguettine
xx: Linguettine

it: Lorighittas
xx: Lorighittas

it: Mafalde
xx: Mafalde

it: Mafaldine
xx: Mafaldine

it: Mezzelune
xx: Mezzelune

it: Occhi di Lupo
xx: Occhi di Lupo

it: Pici
ja: ピチ

it: Sagnarelli
xx: Sagnarelli

it: Scialatelli
xx: Scialatelli

it: Stringozzi
xx: Stringozzi

it: Strozzapreti
xx: Strozzapreti

it: Tripoline
xx: Tripoline